lexc/noun/enhuoaae.lexc
!!!enhuoaae.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§ §JJ§ §JPJ§
§VV§   §ooez13§ §EOA2§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez12§ §oeoez11§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! considered words
! agy
! fal
! fog
! gyár
! hal
! láb
! nyak
! nyál
! oldal
! szál
! szár
! talp
! toll
! tárgy
! vonal
! vár
! ág
! ágy
! áll

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

!LEXICON AddNounaejaje
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possaejaje;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;
!
!LEXICON Possaejaje
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
!+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
!+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
!+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
!+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
!+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
!+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
!+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
!+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
!+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
!+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
!+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
!+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
!+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
!+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
!+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounvall
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possvall;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possvall
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounaejajeot
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possaejajeot;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possaejajeot
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^ot    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Noun
aggregátorgyár AddNounvall;
agyagtalp AddNoun;
akácláb AddNounaejajeot;
alaptalp AddNoun;
algaszál AddNounvall;
apóság AddNounvall;
babaláb AddNounaejajeot;
babatalp AddNoun;
babaágy AddNounvall;
bankkamatláb AddNounaejajeot;
bazaltoldal AddNounvall;
betűszár AddNounvall;
betűtalp AddNoun;
bogárláb AddNounaejajeot;
boltváll AddNounvall;
borospohártalp AddNoun;
bronzláb AddNounaejajeot;
bukógátfal AddNounvall;
bársonytalp AddNoun;
békaláb AddNounaejajeot;
bélgyár AddNounvall;
bérctalp AddNoun;
bőroldal AddNounvall;
cicatalp AddNoun;
cirokszakáll AddNounvall;
cocaláb AddNounaejajeot;
csapágytalp AddNoun;
csempészútvonal AddNounvall;
csizmagyár AddNounvall;
csodaláb AddNounaejajeot;
csomagtartótalp AddNoun;
csúszótalp AddNoun;
csülökagy AddNounvall;
célgömbláb AddNounaejajeot;
célgömbtalp AddNoun;
darabolóvonal AddNounvall;
diszkontláb AddNounaejajeot;
dobozhal AddNounvall;
dongaláb AddNounaejajeot;
díszoldal AddNounvall;
elefánttalp AddNoun;
elektronagy AddNounvall;
emberláb AddNounaejajeot;
emlékezésszál AddNounvall;
esztrádszínvonal AddNounvall;
evezősláb AddNounaejajeot;
farktoll AddNounvall;
farokcsúszótalp AddNoun;
fatalp AddNoun;
fedőtalp AddNoun;
fejláb AddNounaejajeot;
felezőszintvonal AddNounvall;
fenékdeszkatalp AddNoun;
filctalp AddNoun;
filmvonal AddNounvall;
fináncláb AddNounaejajeot;
folyondárszál AddNounvall;
folyóláb AddNounaejajeot;
fotelláb AddNounaejajeot;
fuszulykaszár AddNounvall;
futótalp AddNoun;
féltalp AddNoun;
félvezetőláb AddNounaejajeot;
fémtalp AddNoun;
fényképkörvonal AddNounvall;
fügeág AddNounvall;
főporkoláb AddNounaejajeot;
fűrésztalp AddNoun;
fűrészvonal AddNounvall;
galambtalp AddNoun;
gidaláb AddNounaejajeot;
gorillatalp AddNoun;
gránittalp AddNoun;
gumiláb AddNounaejajeot;
gumiszalaggyár AddNounvall;
gumitalp AddNoun;
gyermektalp AddNoun;
gyíkláb AddNounaejajeot;
gyűjtőgyár AddNounvall;
gémláb AddNounaejajeot;
gépágyútalp AddNoun;
görgőtalp AddNoun;
habláb AddNounaejajeot;
halcsontszár AddNounvall;
hegedűláb AddNounaejajeot;
hernyótalp AddNoun;
hidrogéngyár AddNounvall;
holdtalp AddNoun;
hullaláb AddNounaejajeot;
háncstalp AddNoun;
háttoll AddNounvall;
házláb AddNounaejajeot;
húrtartóláb AddNounaejajeot;
importvédvonal AddNounvall;
juhláb AddNounaejajeot;
járműcsapágy AddNounvall;
járótalp AddNoun;
kakasláb AddNounaejajeot;
kanapéláb AddNounaejajeot;
kapufal AddNounvall;
kapuláb AddNounaejajeot;
karácsonyfatalp AddNoun;
kecskebakláb AddNounaejajeot;
keresztfagyár AddNounvall;
kertláb AddNounaejajeot;
keréktalp AddNoun;
klubvonal AddNounvall;
korridorvonal AddNounvall;
krepptalp AddNoun;
kutyaláb AddNounaejajeot;
kátránygyár AddNounvall;
kötélgyár AddNounvall;
kúszóláb AddNounaejajeot;
kúttalp AddNoun;
legyezőnyak AddNounvall;
lengőláb AddNounaejajeot;
levéltalp AddNoun;
libaláb AddNounaejajeot;
lábtalp AddNoun;
lázhal AddNounvall;
lóláb AddNounaejajeot;
lúdtalp AddNoun;
madárláb AddNounaejajeot;
manóláb AddNounaejajeot;
marhanyak AddNounvall;
medvetalp AddNoun;
mellsőláb AddNounaejajeot;
mikrobuszvonal AddNounvall;
mozsárláb AddNounaejajeot;
márványfal AddNounvall;
mászótalp AddNoun;
műszerláb AddNounaejajeot;
műtalp AddNoun;
nagyságvágy AddNounvall;
nyeregváztalp AddNoun;
nyüstszál AddNounvall;
négyszögláb AddNounaejajeot;
ollóláb AddNounaejajeot;
oroszlántalp AddNoun;
osztályfal AddNounvall;
pajzsláb AddNounaejajeot;
papucstalp AddNoun;
partnerláb AddNounaejajeot;
patentszár AddNounvall;
pedáltalp AddNoun;
pikkelyláb AddNounaejajeot;
pingvinláb AddNounaejajeot;
pogácsaláb AddNounaejajeot;
ponyvaágy AddNounvall;
posztótalp AddNoun;
processzorláb AddNounaejajeot;
pávahal AddNounvall;
pókláb AddNounaejajeot;
ragadozóláb AddNounaejajeot;
raklaptalp AddNoun;
rendszerszál AddNounvall;
reálkamatláb AddNounaejajeot;
rugóláb AddNounaejajeot;
résziparág AddNounvall;
réztalp AddNoun;
rókaláb AddNounaejajeot;
sasláb AddNounaejajeot;
sertésoldal AddNounvall;
simítótalp AddNoun;
szabadláb AddNounaejajeot;
szakaszág AddNounvall;
szalmatalp AddNoun;
szendvicstalp AddNoun;
szerelemoldal AddNounvall;
szigetláb AddNounaejajeot;
szivattyútalp AddNoun;
szoknyagyár AddNounvall;
szánkótalp AddNoun;
szódásüvegtalp AddNoun;
szögtámfal AddNounvall;
szúnyogláb AddNounaejajeot;
síntalp AddNoun;
takarmánygyár AddNounvall;
tapadóláb AddNounaejajeot;
tapadótalp AddNoun;
teletalp AddNoun;
templomoldal AddNounvall;
tigrisláb AddNounaejajeot;
tigristalp AddNoun;
tollágy AddNounvall;
tájfutótalp AddNoun;
támaszkodóláb AddNounaejajeot;
tárgyoldal AddNounvall;
tártalp AddNoun;
túzoktoll AddNounvall;
tükörtalp AddNoun;
tűláb AddNounaejajeot;
vagontalp AddNoun;
varrószál AddNounvall;
vasalótalp AddNoun;
vasháromláb AddNounaejajeot;
vendégtalp AddNoun;
villamosgyár AddNounvall;
vályútalp AddNoun;
védőműtárgy AddNounvall;
vörösréztalp AddNoun;
zergeláb AddNounaejajeot;
zsömlehal AddNounvall;
ászoktalp AddNoun;
ásóláb AddNounaejajeot;
élettárgy AddNounvall;
ónláb AddNounaejajeot;
óriástalp AddNoun;
ördögágy AddNounvall;
